apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
  <pardef n="ll/egir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiríem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiria</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiríeu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiries</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egirien</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiria</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egirem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiré</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egireu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiràs</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiran</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egirà</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egíssim</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egís</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egíssiu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egissis</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egissin</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>egís</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egint</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egint</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egírem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egí</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egíreu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egires</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egiren</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egí</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egiguem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egim</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egiguem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egim</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egiu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ig</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ig</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeix</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egix</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeix</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egix</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeixin</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egisquen</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeixin</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egisquen</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeixi</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egisca</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egeixi</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>egisca</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>igen</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>igen</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ija</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ija</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egir</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egir</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egíem</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egia</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egíeu</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egies</l> 
        <r>egir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>egien</l> 

<e lm="afegir"><i>af</i><par n="ll/egir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="llegir"><i>ll</i><par n="ll/egir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rellegir"><i>rell</i><par n="ll/egir__vblex"/></e>
